Vermont statutes. Title 15B Uniform Interstate Family Support Act
Chapter 18. Interstate Rendition

§ 1801.
Grounds for rendition.

As used in this chapter, “governor” includes an individual performing the functions of governor or the executive authority of a state covered by this title.

The Governor of this State may:

demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual found in the other state who is charged criminally in this State with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee; or

on the demand of the governor of another state, surrender an individual found in this State who is charged criminally in the other state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee.

A provision for rendition of individuals not inconsistent with this title applies to the demand even if the individual whose surrender is demanded was not in the demanding state when the crime was allegedly committed and has not fled therefrom.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 16

, § 2, eff. June 1, 2015.

§ 1802.
Conditions of rendition.

Before making a demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual charged criminally in this State with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee, the Governor of this State may require the prosecutor who has brought the criminal charge for the state to demonstrate that at least 60 days previously the obligee had initiated proceedings for support pursuant to this title or that the proceeding would be of no avail.

If, under this title or a law substantially similar to this title, the governor of another state makes a demand that the Governor of this State surrender an individual charged criminally in that state with having failed to provide for the support of a child or other individual to whom a duty of support is owed, the Governor may require a prosecutor to investigate the demand and report whether a proceeding for support has been initiated or would be effective. If it appears that a proceeding would be effective but has not been initiated, the Governor may delay honoring the demand for a reasonable time to permit the initiation of a proceeding.

If a proceeding for support has been initiated and the individual whose rendition is demanded prevails, the Governor may decline to honor the demand. If the petitioner prevails and the individual whose rendition is demanded is subject to a support order, the Governor may decline to honor the demand if the individual is complying with the support order.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 16

, § 2, eff. June 1, 2015.